North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 4A. Extension of Corporate Limits.
§ 160A-58.1.
Petition for annexation; standards.

Upon receipt of a valid petition signed by all of the owners of real property in the area described therein, a city may annex an area not contiguous to its primary corporate limits when the area meets the standards set out in subsection (b) of this section. The petition need not be signed by the owners of real property that is wholly exempt from property taxation under the Constitution and laws of North Carolina, nor by railroad companies, public utilities as defined in G.S. 62-3(23), or electric or telephone membership corporations. A petition is not valid in any of the following circumstances:

It is unsigned.

It is signed by the city for the annexation of property the city does not own or have a legal interest in. For the purpose of this subdivision, a city has no legal interest in a State-maintained street unless it owns the underlying fee and not just an easement.

It is for the annexation of property for which a signature is not required and the property owner objects to the annexation.

A noncontiguous area proposed for annexation must meet all of the following standards:

The nearest point on the proposed satellite corporate limits must be not more than three miles from the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.

No point on the proposed satellite corporate limits may be closer to the primary corporate limits of another city than to the primary corporate limits of the annexing city, except as set forth in subsection (b2) of this section.

The area must be so situated that the annexing city will be able to provide the same services within the proposed satellite corporate limits that it provides within its primary corporate limits.

If the area proposed for annexation, or any portion thereof, is a subdivision as defined in G.S. 160A-376, all of the subdivision must be included.

The area within the proposed satellite corporate limits, when added to the area within all other satellite corporate limits, may not exceed ten percent (10%) of the area within the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.This subdivision does not apply to the Cities of Asheboro, Belmont, Claremont, Concord, Conover, Durham, Elizabeth City, Gastonia, Greenville, Hickory, Kannapolis, Kings Mountain, Locust, Lowell, Marion, Mount Airy, Mount Holly, New Bern, Newton, Oxford, Randleman, Roanoke Rapids, Rockingham, Saluda, Sanford, Salisbury, Shelby, Southport, Statesville, and Washington and the Towns of Ahoskie, Angier, Apex, Ayden, Belville, Benson, Bladenboro, Bridgeton, Bunn, Burgaw, Calabash, Carthage, Catawba, China Grove, Clayton, Columbia, Columbus, Cramerton, Creswell, Dallas, Dobson, Four Oaks, Franklin, Franklinton, Franklinville, Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Godwin, Granite Quarry, Green Level, Grimesland, Harrisburg, Holly Ridge, Holly Springs, Hookerton, Hope Mills, Huntersville, Jamestown, Kenansville, Kenly, Knightdale, Landis, Leland, Liberty, Lillington, Louisburg, Maggie Valley, Maiden, Mayodan, Maysville, Middlesex, Midland, Mocksville, Morrisville, Mount Pleasant, Nashville, North Wilkesboro, Norwood, Oak Island, Oakboro, Ocean Isle Beach, Pembroke, Pine Level, Pollocksville, Princeton, Ramseur, Ranlo, Richlands, Rockwell, Rolesville, Rutherfordton, Shallotte, Siler City, Smithfield, Spencer, Spring Lake, Stanley, Stem, Stovall, Surf City, Swansboro, Taylorsville, Troutman, Troy, Vass, Wallace, Warsaw, Watha, Waynesville, Weldon, Wendell, West Jefferson, Wilson’s Mills, Windsor, Wingate, Yadkinville, Youngsville, and Zebulon.

(b1)

Repealed by Session Laws 2004-203, ss. 13(a) and 13(d), effective August 17, 2004.

(b2)

A city may annex a noncontiguous area that does not meet the standard set out in subdivision (b)(2) of this section if the city has entered into an annexation agreement pursuant to Part 6 of this Article with the city to which a point on the proposed satellite corporate limits is closer and the agreement states that the other city will not annex the area but does not say that the annexing city will not annex the area. The annexing city shall comply with all other requirements of this section.

The petition shall contain the names, addresses, and signatures of all owners of real property within the proposed satellite corporate limits (except owners not required to sign by subsection (a)), shall describe the area proposed for annexation by metes and bounds, and shall have attached thereto a map showing the area proposed for annexation with relation to the primary corporate limits of the annexing city. When there is any substantial question as to whether the area may be closer to another city than to the annexing city, the map shall also show the area proposed for annexation with relation to the primary corporate limits of the other city. The city council may prescribe the form of the petition.

A city council which receives a petition for annexation under this section may by ordinance require that the petitioners file a signed statement declaring whether or not vested rights with respect to the properties subject to the petition have been established under G.S. 160A-385.1 or G.S. 153A-344.1. If the statement declares that such rights have been established, the city may require petitioners to provide proof of such rights. A statement which declares that no vested rights have been established under G.S. 160A-385.1 or G.S. 153A-344.1 shall be binding on the landowner and any such vested rights shall be terminated.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 996, s. 4; 1997-2, s. 1; 2001-37, s. 1; 2001-72, s. 1; 2001-438, s. 1; 2002-121, s. 1; 2003-30, s. 1; 2004-203, s. 13(a), (c); 2004-57, s. 1; 2004-99, s. 1; 2004-203, ss. 13(a)-(d); 2005-52, s. 1; 2005-71, s. 1; 2005-79, s. 1; 2005-173, s. 1; 2005-433, s. 9; 2006-62, s. 1; 2006-122, s. 1; 2006-130, s. 1; 2007-17, s. 1; 2007-26, ss. 1, 2(a); 2007-62, s. 1; 2007-225, s. 1; 2007-311, s. 1; 2007-342, s. 1; 2008-24, s. 1; 2008-30, s. 1; 2009-40, s. 2; 2009-53, s. 1; 2009-111, s. 1; 2009-156, s. 1; 2009-298, s. 1; 2009-323, s. 1; 2011-57, s. 1; 2012-96, s. 1; 2013-248, s. 1; 2014-30, s. 2(a); 2015-80, s. 1; 2015-81, s. 2(a); 2015-172, s. 2; 2016-48, s. 2; 2018-56, s. 1; 2019-58, s. 1; 2019-103, s. 1; 2019-160, s. 1; 2021-17, s. 2; 2021-21, s. 1; 2021-86, s. 1; 2021-87, s. 1; 2021-101, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Brunswick: 2001-478, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)); Municipalities located wholly or partly in Guilford: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1009, s. 6; Union: 2003-321, s. 1; city of Archdale: 2015-81, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(4)); city of Asheboro: 1998-203, s. 1; city of Asheville: 2005-139, s. 3 (applicable to petitions for annexation received on or after June 30, 2005); city of Belmont: 2009-111 (as to subdivision (b)(5)); 2017-48, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(5)); city of Brevard: 1987, c. 254, s. 2; 2001-105, s. 2 (as to subdivision (b)(5)) city of Durham: 1987, c. 606; 2007-269, s. 1.1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)); city of Greensboro: 1997-344, s. 1; city of Greenville: 1999-283, s. 1; city of Henderson: 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 3, s. 1; city of Hickory: 1987, c. 179; 1999-208, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 49; city of Kannapolis: 2007-344, ss. 1, 3 (as to subdivision (b), and applicable only to annexations in the area of Cabarrus County bound by the existing city of Kannapolis corporate limits to the east, Mecklenburg County/Cabarrus County line to the west, the Cabarrus County/Rowan County/Iredell County lines to the north, and N.C. Highway 73 to the south); city of King’s Mountain: 2003-241, s. 1; city of Kinston: 2017-85, s. 3(b); (as to subsection (c)); city of Mebane: 2017-82, s. 1; city of Mooresville, 1995, c. 82, s. 1; city of Mount Airy: 1999-232, s. 1; 2003-281, s. 1; city of Mount Holly: 1985, c. 110; city of New Bern: 1989, c. 382, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 605, s. 3; 2016-41, s. 5; city of Newton: 2002-50, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)); city of Raleigh: 1998-200, s. 1; city of Reidsville: 1997-343; city of Rockingham: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 654, s. 1; city of Sanford: 2007-43, s. 1; 2019-105, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(1)); city of Statesville: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 882, s. 1; city of Winston-Salem: 2004-37, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)); town of Andrews: 2003-243, s. 1 (as to certain locations); town of Apex: 1993, c. 312, s. 3; 1995, c. 82, s. 1; town of Banner Elk: 1998-77; town of Beaufort: 1995, c. 82, s. 1, 1997-432, s. 1, 2003-204, s. 1; 2019-105, s. 1 (as to subsection (b)); town of Brookford: 1999-208, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 49; town of Butner: 2007-269, s. 1.1 (as precleared under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act),
as amended by 2012-117, s. 1; town of Canton: 1983, c. 301; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 979; 1997-2, s. 1; town of Clayton: 1993, c. 63, s. 1; 1999-10, s. 1; 2007-327, s. 2 (as to subdivision (b)(1)); town of Cornelius: 1999-103, s. 1; town of Davidson: 1999-85, s. 1; town of Eastover: 2007-267, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2), contingent on preclearance under section 5 of the Voting Rights Act); town of Edenton: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 707; town of Franklin: 2015-81, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(4)); town of Fuquay-Varina: 1999-304, s. 1; town of Holly Springs: 1991, c. 243 (as to annexation ordinances adopted before July 1, 1993); town of Huntersville: 1999-24, s. 1; town of Kenly; 1987, c. 67; town of Kernersville: 2004-37, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)): town of Knightdale: 1987, c. 234; town of Madison (subdivision (b)(2) does not apply to Madison): 1997-251, s. 2; town of Maggie Valley: 2005-79 (as to subdivision (b)(4)); and 2008-28 (as to subdivision (b)(1), and applicable to annexations in certain area in Haywood county); town of Mayodan: 2001-405 (as to subdivisions (b)(4) and (b)(5)); town of Mooresville: 1997-219, ss. 2, 3; town of Morehead City: 1998-42; town of Oak Island: 2007-26, s. 2 (as to subdivision (b)(2) and notification requirement to the town of St. James); town of Oak Ridge: 1998-113; town of Pittsboro: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1023, s. 4.1; town of Pleasant Garden: 1997-344, s. 1; towns of Summerfield and Leland: 1997-249; town of Trent Woods: 1989, c. 382, s. 1; town of Troy: 1993, c. 159, s. 2; town of Wake Forest: 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 882, s. 2(a); 1997-432, s. 1(a), (b); town of Wallace: 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 692, s. 1; 2012-118, s. 1, as amended by 2013-32, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(4)); town of Waxhaw: 2003-273, s. 2(b); town of Weaverville: 1989, c. 181, s. 1 (applicable with respect to annexation ordinances adopted on or before June 30, 1990); 1997-151, s. 2; town of Winterville: 2001-77, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(2)); village of Foxfire: 2014-30, s. 1(a) (as to subdivision (b)(4)); village of Marvin: 2002-140, s. 1 (as to subdivision (b)(5)).

§ 160A-58.2.
Public hearing.

Upon receipt of a petition for annexation under this Part, the city council shall cause the city clerk to investigate the petition, and to certify the results of his investigation. If the clerk certifies that upon investigation the petition appears to be valid, the council shall fix a date for a public hearing on the annexation. Notice of the hearing shall be published once at least 10 days before the date of hearing.

At the hearing, any person residing in or owning property in the area proposed for annexation and any resident of the annexing city may appear and be heard on the questions of the sufficiency of the petition and the desirability of the annexation. If the council then finds and determines that (i) the area described in the petition meets all of the standards set out in

G.S. 160A-58.1(b)

, (ii) the petition bears the signatures of all of the owners of real property within the area proposed for annexation (except those not required to sign by

G.S. 160A-58.1(a)

), (iii) the petition is otherwise valid, and (iv) the public health, safety and welfare of the inhabitants of the city and of the area proposed for annexation will be best served by the annexation, the council may adopt an ordinance annexing the area described in the petition. The ordinance may be made effective immediately or on any specified date within six months from the date of passage.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 1993, c. 342, s. 1; 2013-386, s. 3; city of Reidsville: 1997-343; town of Pittsboro: 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1023, s. 4.1.

§ 160A-58.2A.
Assumption of debt.

If the city has annexed under this Part any area which is served by a rural fire department and which is in:

An insurance district defined under

G.S. 153A-233

;

A rural fire protection district under Article 3A of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes; or

A fire service district under Article 16 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes,

then beginning with the effective date of annexation the city shall pay annually a proportionate share of any payments due on any debt (including principal and interest) relating to facilities or equipment of the rural fire department, if the debt was existing at the time of submission of the petition for annexation to the city under this Part. The rural fire department shall make available to the city not later than 30 days following a written request from the city, information concerning such debt. The rural fire department forfeits its rights under this section if it fails to make a good faith response within 45 days following receipt of the written request for information from the city, provided that the city’s written request so states by specific reference to this section.

The annual payments from the city to the rural fire department on such shared debt service shall be calculated as follows:

The rural fire department shall certify to the city each year the amount that will be expended for debt service subject to be shared by the city as provided by subsection (a) of this section; and

The amount determined under subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be multiplied by the percentage determined by dividing the assessed valuation of the area of the district annexed by the assessed valuation of the entire district, each such valuation to be fixed as of the date the annexation ordinance becomes effective.

This section does not apply in any year as to any annexed area(s) for which the payment calculated under this section as to all annexation ordinances adopted under this Part by a city during a particular calendar year does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00).

The city and rural fire department shall jointly present a payment schedule to the Local Government Commission for approval and no payment may be made until such schedule is approved. The Local Government Commission shall approve a payment schedule agreed upon between the city and the rural fire department in cases where the assessed valuation of the district may not readily be determined, if there is a reasonable basis for the agreement.

History.

1989, c. 598, s. 3.

§ 160A-58.3.
Annexed area subject to city taxes and debts.

From and after the effective date of the annexation ordinance, the annexed area and its citizens and property are subject to all debts, laws, ordinances and regulations of the annexing city, and are entitled to the same privileges and benefits as other parts of the city. Real and personal property in the newly annexed territory on the January 1 immediately preceding the beginning of the fiscal year in which the annexation becomes effective is subject to municipal taxes as provided in

G.S. 160A-58.10

. If the effective date of annexation falls between June 1 and June 30, and the privilege licenses of the annexing city are due on June 1, then businesses in the annexed area are liable for privilege license taxes at the full-year rate.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2; 1975, c. 576, s. 5; 1977, c. 517, s. 7.

§ 160A-58.4.
Extraterritorial powers.

Satellite corporate limits shall not be considered a part of the city’s corporate limits for the purposes of extraterritorial land-use regulation pursuant to

G.S. 160A-360

, or abatement of public health nuisances pursuant to

G.S. 160A-193

. However, a city’s power to regulate land use pursuant to Chapter 160A, Article 19, or to abate public health nuisances pursuant to

G.S. 160A-193

, shall be the same within satellite corporate limits as within its primary corporate limits.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Town of Canton: 1983, c. 301; town of Mooresville: 1991, c. 289, s. 1; 1997-219, s. 4.

§ 160A-58.5.
Special rates for water, sewer and other enterprises.

For the purposes of

G.S. 160A-314

, provision of public enterprise services within satellite corporate limits shall be considered provision of service for special classes of service distinct from the classes of service provided within the primary corporate limits of the city, and the city may fix and enforce schedules of rents, rates, fees, charges and penalties in excess of those fixed and enforced within the primary corporate limits. A city providing enterprise services within satellite corporate limits shall annually review the cost thereof, and shall take such steps as may be necessary to insure that the current operating costs of such services, excluding debt service on bonds issued to finance services within satellite corporate limits, does not exceed revenues realized therefrom.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to satellite annexation in conjunction with municipal annexation in certain sanitary districts, see

G.S. 130A-70.1

.

§ 160A-58.6.
Transition from satellite to primary corporate limits.

An area annexed pursuant to this Part ceases to constitute satellite corporate limits and becomes a part of the primary corporate limits of a city when, through annexation of intervening territory, the two boundaries touch.

History.

1973, c. 1173, s. 2.

§ 160A-58.7.
Annexation of municipal property.

The city council may initiate annexation of property not contiguous to the primary corporate limits and owned by the city by adopting a resolution stating its intent to annex the property, in lieu of filing a petition. The property must satisfy the requirements of

G.S. 160A-58.1

. The resolution shall contain an adequate description of the property and fix a date for a public hearing on the question of annexation. Notice of the public hearing shall be published once at least 10 days before the date of the hearing. At the hearing, any resident of the city may appear and be heard on the question of the desirability of the annexation. If the council finds that annexation is in the public interest, it may adopt an ordinance annexing the property. The ordinance may be made effective immediately or on any specified date within six months from the date of passage.

A city has no authority to adopt a resolution or petition itself under this Part for annexation of property it does not own or have any legal interest in. For the purpose of this subsection, a city has no legal interest in a State-maintained street unless it owns the underlying fee and not just an easement.

History.

1987, c. 562, s. 2; 2011-57, s. 2.

Local Modification.

City of Durham: 1993, c. 342, s. 1; 2013-386, s. 3; 2015-82, s. 1 (as to subsection (b)); city of Reidsville: 1997-343.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-57, s. 2, effective April 28, 2011, added the subsection (a) designation; and added subsection (b).

§ 160A-58.8.
Recording and reporting.

Annexations made under this part shall be recorded and reported in the same manner as under

G.S. 160A-29

.

History.

1987, c. 879, s. 4.

Part 4A. Effective Dates of Certain Annexation Ordinances.

§ 160A-58.9.
Effective date of certain annexation ordinances adopted from January 1, 1987, to August 3, 1987.

In the case of any annexation ordinance adopted during the period beginning January 1, 1987, and ending on August 3, 1987, if the effective date of the annexation under the ordinance is during 1988, the governing board of the municipality may, notwithstanding G.S. 160A-37(j) or G.S. 160A-49(j), amend the ordinance to provide for an effective date of December 31, 1987. The board must give notice by publication of its intent to consider adoption of such ordinance, such notice to be published at least 10 days before the meeting at which the ordinance is adopted. Copies of the adopted ordinance shall be recorded in accordance with the provisions of G.S. 160A-39 or

G.S. 160A-58.61

, as applicable.

This section applies only to territory located in counties with a population of 55,000 or over, according to the 1980 decennial federal census.

History.

1987, c. 715, s. 2.

§ 160A-58.9A.
Effective date of certain annexation ordinances adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A.

No annexation ordinance adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes may become effective during the period beginning November 1, 1989, and ending January 1, 1990. If because of the operation of G.S. 160A-37.1(h), G.S. 160A-37.3(g), G.S. 160A-38, G.S. 160A-58.57(h), G.S. 160A-58.59(g),

G.S. 160A-50

, the order of any court, or the operation of Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, an annexation ordinance is to become effective during the period beginning November 1, 1989, and ending January 1, 1990, it shall instead become effective on a date during the period beginning January 2, 1990, and ending December 31, 1990, set by ordinance of the governing board of the city.

If the final date upon which an annexation ordinance adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, may be made effective occurs during the period beginning November 1, 1989, and ending January 1, 1990, the effective date of the annexation may be set in the annexation ordinance as any date during the period beginning January 2, 1990, and ending December 31, 1990, in addition to any date permitted by law before November 1, 1989.

This section applies to territory located in counties with a population of 55,000 or over, according to the 1980 decennial federal census, and to territory located in all other counties subject to Part 2 of Article 12A of Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, pursuant to

G.S. 163-132.6

.

History.

1987, c. 715, s. 3; 1989, c. 440, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled `Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification, in consultation with the State Ethics Commission, the State Board of Elections, the Secretary of State, and the new Bipartisan State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “Part 2 of Article 20 of Chapter 163A” for “Article 12A of Chapter 163” in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b) and 6.1 repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the changes to references in subsection (c).

§ 160A-58.10.
Tax of newly annexed territory.

Applicability of Section. — Real and personal property in territory annexed pursuant to this Article is subject to municipal taxes as provided in this section.

Prorated Taxes. — Real and personal property in the newly annexed territory on the January 1 immediately preceding the beginning of the fiscal year in which the annexation becomes effective is subject to prorated municipal taxes levied for that fiscal year as provided in this subsection. The amount of municipal taxes that would have been due on the property had it been within the municipality for the full fiscal year shall be multiplied by the following fraction: the denominator shall be 12 and the numerator shall be the number of full calendar months remaining in the fiscal year, following the day on which the annexation becomes effective. The product of the multiplication is the amount of prorated taxes due. The lien for prorated taxes levied on a parcel of real property shall attach to the parcel taxed on the listing date, as provided in

G.S. 105-285

, immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the annexation becomes effective. The lien for prorated taxes levied on personal property shall attach on the same date to all real property of the taxpayer in the taxing unit, including the newly annexed territory. If the annexation becomes effective after June 30 and before September 2, the prorated taxes shall be due and payable on the first day of September of the fiscal year for which the taxes are levied. If the annexation becomes effective after September 1 and before the following July 1, the prorated taxes shall be due and payable on the first day of September of the next succeeding fiscal year. The prorated taxes are subject to collection and foreclosure in the same manner as other taxes levied for the fiscal year in which the prorated taxes become due.

Taxes in Subsequent Fiscal Years. — In fiscal years subsequent to the fiscal year in which an annexation becomes effective, real and personal property in the newly annexed territory is subject to municipal taxes on the same basis as is the preexisting territory of the municipality.

Transfer of Tax Records. — For purposes of levying prorated taxes the municipality shall obtain from the county a record of property in the area being annexed that was listed for taxation on the January 1 immediately preceding the fiscal year for which the prorated taxes are levied. In addition, if the effective date of annexation falls between January 1 and June 30, the municipality shall, for purposes of levying taxes for the fiscal year beginning July 1 following the date of annexation, obtain from the county a record of property in the area being annexed that was listed for taxation as of said January 1.

History.

1977, c. 517, s. 9.

Cross References.

As to effective date of annexation ordinances adopted under Article 4A of Chapter 160A, see

G.S. 160A-58.9

A.

§§ 160A-58.11 through 160A-58.20.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Annexation Agreements.

§ 160A-58.21.
Purpose.

It is the purpose of this Part to authorize cities to enter into binding agreements concerning future annexation in order to enhance orderly planning by such cities as well as residents and property owners in areas adjacent to such cities.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 160A-58.22.
Definitions.

The words defined in this section shall have the meanings indicated when used in this Part:

“Agreement” means any written agreement authorized by this Part.

“Annexation” means any extension of a city’s corporate limits as authorized by this Article, the charter of the city, or any local act applicable to the city, as such statutory authority exists now or is hereafter amended.

“Participating city” means any city which is a party to an agreement.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 160A-58.23.
Annexation agreements authorized.

Two or more cities may enter into agreements in order to designate one or more areas which are not subject to annexation by one or more of the participating cities. The agreements shall be of reasonable duration, not to exceed 20 years, and shall be approved by ordinance of the governing board and executed by the mayor of each city and spread upon its minutes.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 160A-58.24.
Contents of agreements; procedure.

The agreement shall:

State the duration of the agreement.

Describe clearly the area or areas subject to the agreement. The boundaries of such area or areas may be established at such locations as the participating cities shall agree. Thereafter, any participating city may follow such boundaries in annexing any property, whether or not such boundaries follow roads or natural topographical features.

Specify one or more participating cities which may not annex the area or areas described in the agreement.

State the effective date of the agreement.

Require each participating city which proposes any annexation to give written notice to the other participating city or cities of the annexation at least 60 days before the adoption of any annexation ordinance; provided, however, that the agreement may provide for a waiver of this time period by the notified city.

Include any other necessary or proper matter.

The written notice required by subdivision (a)(5) of this section shall describe the area to be annexed by a legible map, clearly and accurately showing the boundaries of the area to be annexed in relation to: the area or areas described pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section, roads, streams and any other prominent geographical features. Such notice shall not be effective for more than 180 days.

No agreement may be entered into under this Part unless each participating city has held a public hearing on the agreement prior to adopting the ordinance approving the agreement. The governing boards of the participating cities may hold a joint public hearing if desired. Notice of the public hearing or hearings shall be given as provided in G.S. 160A-31(c).

Any agreement entered into under this Part may be modified or terminated by a subsequent agreement entered into by all the participating cities to that agreement. The subsequent agreement shall be approved by ordinance after a public hearing or hearings as provided in subsection (c).

No agreement entered into under this Part shall be binding beyond three miles of the primary corporate limits of a participating city which is permitted to annex the area under the agreement, unless approved by the board of county commissioners with jurisdiction over the area. Provided however, that an area where the agreement is not binding because of failure of the board of county commissioners to approve it, shall become subject to the agreement if subsequent annexation brings it within three miles. The approval of a board of county commissioners shall be evidenced by a resolution adopted after a public hearing as provided in subsection (c).

A participating city may terminate an annexation agreement unilaterally or withdraw itself from the agreement, by repealing the ordinance by which it approved the agreement and providing five years’ written notice to the other participating cities. Upon the expiration of the five-year period, an agreement originally involving only two cities shall terminate, and an agreement originally involving more than two cities shall terminate unless each of the other participating cities shall have adopted an ordinance reaffirming the agreement.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Town of Carthage: 1999-239, s. 11.

§ 160A-58.25.
Effect of agreement.

From and after the effective date of an agreement, no participating city may adopt an annexation ordinance as to all or any portion of an area in violation of the agreement.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 160A-58.26.
Part grants no annexation authority.

Nothing in this Part shall be construed to authorize the annexation of any area which is not otherwise subject to annexation under applicable law.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

§ 160A-58.27.
Relief.

Each provision of an agreement shall be binding upon the respective parties. Not later than 30 days following the passage of an annexation ordinance concerning territory subject to an agreement, a participating city which believes that another participating city has violated this Part or the agreement may file a petition in the superior court of the county where any of the territory proposed to be annexed is located, seeking review of the action of the city alleged to have violated this Part or the agreement.

Within five days after the petition is filed with the court, the petitioning city shall serve copies of the petition by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the respondent city.

Within 15 days after receipt of the copy of the petition for review, or within such additional time as the court may allow, the respondent city shall transmit to the reviewing court:

A transcript of the portions of the ordinance or minute book in which the procedure for annexation has been set forth;

A copy of resolutions, ordinances, and any other document received or approved by the respondent city’s governing board as part of the annexation proceeding.

The court shall fix the date for review of the petition so that review shall be expeditious and without unnecessary delays. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury. The court may hear oral arguments and receive written briefs, and may take evidence intended to show either:

That the provisions of this Part were not met; or

That the provisions of the agreement were not met.

At any time before or during the review proceeding, any petitioner may apply to the reviewing court for an order staying the operation of the annexation ordinance pending the outcome of the review. The court may grant or deny the stay in its discretion upon such terms as it deems proper, and it may permit annexation of any part of the area described in the ordinance concerning which no question for review has been raised.

Upon a finding that the respondent city has not violated this Part or the agreement, the court may affirm the action of the respondent city without change. Upon a finding that the respondent city has violated this Part or the agreement, the court may:

Remand to the respondent city’s governing board any ordinance adopted pursuant to Parts 2 or 3 of this Article, as the same exists now or is hereafter amended, for amendment of the boundaries, or for such other action as is necessary, to conform to the provisions of this Part and the agreement.

Declare any annexation begun pursuant to any other applicable law to be void. If the respondent city shall fail to take action in accordance with the court’s instructions upon remand under subdivision (d)(1) of this section within three months from receipt of such instructions, the annexation proceeding shall be void.

Any participating city which is a party to the review proceedings may appeal from the final judgment of the superior court under rules of procedure applicable in other civil cases. The appealing party may apply to superior court for a stay in its final determination, or a stay of the annexation ordinance, whichever shall be appropriate, pending the outcome of the appeal to the appellate division; provided, that the superior court may, with the agreement of the parties, permit annexation to be effective with respect to any part of the area concerning which no appeal is being made and which can be incorporated into the respondent city without regard to any part of the area concerning which an appeal is being made.

If part or all of the area annexed under the terms of a challenged annexation ordinance is the subject of an appeal to the superior court or appellate division on the effective date of the ordinance, then the ordinance shall be deemed amended to make the effective date with respect to such area the date of the final judgment of the superior court or appellate division, whichever is appropriate, or the date the respondent city’s governing board completes action to make the ordinance conform to the court’s instructions in the event of remand.

A participating city which is prohibited from annexing into an area under a binding agreement may file a petition in the superior court where any of the territory proposed to be annexed is located, or a response in a proceeding initiated by another participating city, seeking permission to annex territory in the area notwithstanding the agreement. If the territory qualifies for annexation by the city seeking to annex it, the court may enter an order allowing the annexation to proceed with respect to all or a portion of the territory upon a finding that there is an imminent threat to public health or safety that can be remedied only by the city seeking annexation. The procedural provisions of this section shall apply to proceedings under this subsection, so far as applicable.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Town of Carthage: 1999-239, s. 11.

§ 160A-58.28.
Effect on prior local acts.

This Part does not affect Chapter 953, Session Laws of 1983, Chapter 847, Session Laws of 1985 (1986 Regular Session), or Chapters 204, 233, or 1009, Session Laws of 1987, authorizing annexation agreements, but any city which is authorized to enter into agreements by one of those acts may enter into future agreements either under such act or this Part.

History.

1989, c. 143, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 48.

§§ 160A-58.29 through 160A-58.49.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 7. Annexations Initiated by Municipalities.